District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.07

Adjustments in rent ceiling.

Repealed.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 207, 32 DCR 3089
Aug. 5, 2006, D.C. Law 16-145, § 2(d), 53 DCR 4889
This section is referenced in § 42-3502.08.
1981 Ed., § 45-2517.